Wyoming, session 2025, HB0123.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-3-103 is amended to read:

1-3-103. Recovery of real property; generally.

(a) An action for the recovery of the title or
possession of lands, tenements or hereditaments can only be
HB0123

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0144
brought within ten (10) years after the cause of such
action accrues.

(b) The time period of adverse possession necessary
to establish a claim for adverse possession shall not run
at any time that the person against whom the claim would be
brought has paid all taxes and assessments against the
lands, tenements or hereditaments that would be the subject
of the adverse possession claim.

Section 2. This act shall apply to any civil action
for adverse possession accruing on and after July 1, 2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0123